Delaware, session 153, SB347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2505J, Title 6 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2505J. Billing and collections rules; limits on creditors. (a) The following extraordinary collections actions may not be used by any medical creditor or medical debt collector to collect debts owed for health-care services: (6) Levying on tangible personal property of a patient. (g) A large health-care facility or medical creditor that sells medical debt to a medical debt buyer or medical debt collector under a contract described in Â§ 2502J(4)a. of this title remains liable for any actions taken by the medical debt buyer or medical debt collector, including any violations of any provisions of this chapter. (g) Any party taking action to collect medical debt must disclose in court pleadings whether the party is a medical creditor, a medical debt collector, or neither, as defined in Â§ 2502J. Failure to properly disclose or accurately disclose such information is a violation of this chapter and subject to all remedies under Â§ 2511J of this chapter.